Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.430

Supervisor.

The supervisor shall:

(1) Be charged with the direct supervision of the department's activities as delegated by the administrator;

(2) Perform his or her duties in conformance with the policies established by the board;

(3) Organize the department, with approval of the administrator, into such subordinate divisions as the supervisor deems appropriate for the conduct of its operations;

(4) Employ and fix the compensation of such technical, clerical, and other personnel as may be required to carry on activities under his or her supervision;

(5) Delegate by order any assigned powers, duties, and functions to one or more deputies or assistants, as desired;

(6) Furnish before entering upon the duties of this position a surety bond payable to the state in such amount as may be determined by the board, conditioned for the faithful performance of duties and for accounting of all moneys and property of the state that may come into possession of or under the control of this position.

[ 2003 c 334 s 115; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.170. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 17. Formerly RCW 43.30.170.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.